Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 7. Reports and Examinations

§ 13-3-701.
Reports to state banking commissioner.

through (c) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 64, § 2.

The state banking commissioner may call for special reports verified under oath from any bank at any time as necessary to inform the state banking commissioner of the condition of the bank.

All reports required of financial institutions by the commissioner under this act and all materials relating to examinations of financial institutions under this act shall be subject to the provisions of W.S.

9-1-512

.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, §§ 27, 28, 41; R.S. 1931, §§ 10-127, 10-128, 10-143; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-128, 35-129, 35-146; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-15, 13-16, 13-18; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1992, ch. 46, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 1995, ch. 111, § 1; 1998, ch. 64, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to criminal penalty for failure to make reports, see §

13-10-107

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in subsection (e), see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

§ 13-3-702.
Inspection of banks; fees.

Every bank is subject to the inspection of the state banking commissioner. The state banking commissioner or a duly appointed examiner shall visit and examine each bank as often as the commissioner deems necessary and at least as frequently as required by the federal deposit insurance corporation, with or without previous notice to the officers of or anyone interested in the bank. The state banking commissioner or a duly appointed examiner shall make a complete and careful examination of the condition and resources of the bank, the mode of managing bank affairs and conducting its business, the action of bank officers and directors in the investment and disposition of bank funds, the safety and prudence of bank management, the security afforded to those by whom bank engagements are held, whether the requirements of this act are being complied with and such other matters as the state banking commissioner may prescribe. If the state banking commissioner examines a bank more than twice in any calendar year, the bank shall pay to the state banking commissioner an additional fee established by rule and regulation of the commissioner.

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 14, § 2.

On or before January 31 and July 31 each bank shall compute and pay supervisory fees to the state banking commissioner based on the total asset base of the bank as of the preceding December 31 and June 30 respectively. The supervisory fees are to provide for the general administration and operating costs of the office of the state banking commissioner for the administration of the laws and regulations governing the banking industry generally. Such fees shall be established by regulation of the state banking commissioner and shall be adjusted by regulations issued by the state banking commissioner to assure consistency with the cost of supervision and the fees paid by national banks. Other fees assessed for administrative services caused by applications or activities attributable to a specific financial institution or entity, shall be used to defray the cost of the special services and, to the extent possible, shall be recovered from the financial institution or entity which requires the special service.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 155, §§ 7, 11; R.S. 1931, §§ 109-507, 109-511; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-807, 18-811; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-95, 9-98; Laws 1971, ch. 20, § 1; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1979, ch. 34, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1994, ch. 14, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 111, § 1; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “established by rule and regulation of the commissioner” for “of fifty dollars ($50.00) per examiner per day and actual expenses of each examiner” in the last sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the next-to-last sentence in subsection (a), see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

§ 13-3-703.
Exchange with federal deposit insurance corporation and federal reserve system authorized.

The state banking commissioner may accept examinations of banks by or reports to the federal deposit insurance corporation or federal reserve system in lieu of examinations or reports required by this act.

The state banking commissioner may furnish copies of reports from and examinations of banks under state supervision and information possessed by the state banking commissioner with reference to the conditions of affairs of banks to the federal deposit insurance corporation or federal reserve system.

The provisions of this section are in addition to other provisions of this act which authorize the commissioner to receive examination or other reports or share examination or other reports with other bank supervisory agencies.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 86, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 35-804; W.S. 1957, § 13-110; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1979, ch. 34, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1997, ch. 75, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

Severability. —

Laws 1937, ch. 86, § 5, provides: “The validity of any provision or part of this act shall not be dependent upon any other provision or part thereof. If any provision or part thereof should for any reason be held unconstitutional or invalid such decision shall not affect the validity of any of the remaining provisions or parts of this act.”

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1937, ch. 86, § 6, repeals Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 8, which authorized banks to become members of the “temporary federal deposit insurance fund” or stockholders of the federal deposit insurance corporation created by the federal “Banking Act of 1933.”

§ 13-3-704.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 155, § 4, related to the authority of the commissioner to issue rules and regulations to implement and administer the laws governing financial institutions.